Ohio, session 136, HB419.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 4501.21 be amended and section 4
4503.727 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: 5
Sec. 4501.21. (A) There is hereby created in the state 6
treasury the license plate contribution fund. The fund shall 7
consist of all contributions for specialty license plates paid 8
by motor vehicle registrants and collected by the registrar of 9
motor vehicles pursuant to the Revised Code sections referenced 10
in division (B) of this section. 11
(B) The registrar shall pay the contributions the 12
registrar collects in the fund as follows: 13
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 14
pursuant to section 4503.491 of the Revised Code to the breast 15
cancer fund of Ohio, which shall use that money only to pay for 16
programs that provide assistance and education to Ohio breast 17
cancer patients and that improve access for such patients to 18

H. B. No. 419 Page 2
As Introduced
quality health care and clinical trials and shall not use any of 19
the money for abortion information, counseling, services, or 20
other abortion-related activities. 21
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 22
receives pursuant to section 4503.492 of the Revised Code to the 23
organization cancer support community central Ohio, which shall 24
deposit the money into the Sheryl L. Kraner Fund of that 25
organization. Cancer support community central Ohio shall expend 26
the money it receives pursuant to this division only in the same 27
manner and for the same purposes as that organization expends 28
other money in that fund. 29
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 30
pursuant to section 4503.493 of the Revised Code to the autism 31
society of Ohio, which shall use the contributions for programs 32
and autism awareness efforts throughout the state. 33
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 34
receives pursuant to section 4503.494 of the Revised Code to the 35
national multiple sclerosis society for distribution in equal 36
amounts to the northwestern Ohio, Ohio buckeye, and Ohio valley 37
chapters of the national multiple sclerosis society. These 38
chapters shall use the money they receive under this section to 39
assist in paying the expenses they incur in providing services 40
directly to their clients. 41
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 42
receives pursuant to section 4503.495 of the Revised Code to the 43
national pancreatic cancer foundation, which shall use the money 44
it receives under this section to assist those who have 45
pancreatic cancer and their families. 46
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 47

H. B. No. 419 Page 3
As Introduced
receives pursuant to section 4503.496 of the Revised Code to the 48
Ohio sickle cell and health association, which shall use the 49
contributions to help support educational, clinical, and social 50
support services for adults who have sickle cell disease. 51
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 52
receives pursuant to section 4503.497 of the Revised Code to the 53
St. Baldrick's foundation, which shall use the contributions for 54
its research and other programs. 55
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 56
receives pursuant to section 4503.498 of the Revised Code to 57
special olympics Ohio, inc., which shall use the contributions 58
for its programs, charitable efforts, and other activities. 59
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 60
receives pursuant to section 4503.499 of the Revised Code to the 61
children's glioma cancer foundation, which shall use the 62
contributions for its research and other programs. 63
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 64
receives pursuant to section 4503.4910 of the Revised Code to 65
the KylerStrong foundation, which shall use the contributions to 66
raise awareness of brain cancer caused by diffuse intrinsic 67
pontine glioma and to fund research for the cure of such cancer. 68
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 69
receives pursuant to section 4503.4911 of the Revised Code to 70
the research institution for childhood cancer at nationwide 71
children's hospital, which shall use the contributions to fund 72
research for the cure of childhood cancers. 73
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 74
receives pursuant to section 4503.4912 of the Revised Code to 75
the Ben Morrison memorial fund, which shall use the 76

H. B. No. 419 Page 4
As Introduced
contributions for scholarships and other programs that support 77
mental health. 78
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 79
receives pursuant to section 4503.50 of the Revised Code to the 80
future farmers of America foundation, which shall deposit the 81
contributions into its general account to be used for 82
educational and scholarship purposes of the future farmers of 83
America foundation. 84
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 85
receives pursuant to section 4503.501 of the Revised Code to the 86
4-H youth development program of the Ohio state university 87
extension program, which shall use those contributions to pay 88
the expenses it incurs in conducting its educational activities. 89
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 90
pursuant to section 4503.502 of the Revised Code to the Ohio 91
cattlemen's foundation, which shall use those contributions for 92
scholarships and other educational activities. 93
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 94
pursuant to section 4503.505 of the Revised Code to the 95
organization Ohio region phi theta kappa, which shall use those 96
contributions for scholarships for students who are members of 97
that organization. 98
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 99
receives pursuant to section 4503.506 of the Revised Code to 100
Ohio demolay, which shall use the contributions for 101
scholarships, educational programs, and any other programs or 102
events the organization holds or sponsors in this state. 103
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 104
pursuant to section 4503.507 of the Revised Code to the Ohio 105

H. B. No. 419 Page 5
As Introduced
aerospace institute, which shall use those contributions to 106
facilitate student internships in aerospace and educational 107
programming. 108
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 109
pursuant to section 4503.508 of the Revised Code to the 110
organization bottoms up diaper drive to provide funding for that 111
organization for collecting and delivering diapers to parents in 112
need. 113
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 114
receives pursuant to section 4503.509 of the Revised Code to a 115
kid again, incorporated for distribution in equal amounts to the 116
Ohio chapters of a kid again. 117
The registrar shall pay each contribution the registrar 118
receives pursuant to section 4503.51 of the Revised Code to the 119
university or college whose name or marking or design appears on 120
collegiate license plates that are issued to a person under that 121
section. A university or college that receives contributions 122
from the fund shall deposit the contributions into its general 123
scholarship fund. 124
The registrar shall pay each contribution the registrar 125
receives pursuant to section 4503.512 of the Revised Code to the 126
Iota Phi Theta Fraternity, Incorporated Delta Theta Omega 127
chapter in Ohio. The Iota Phi Theta Fraternity, Incorporated 128
Delta Theta Omega chapter shall use the contributions for the 129
development and perpetuation of scholarship, leadership, 130
citizenship, fidelity, and brotherhood among men and youth in 131
this state. 132
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 133
receives pursuant to section 4503.514 of the Revised Code to the 134

H. B. No. 419 Page 6
As Introduced
university of Notre Dame in South Bend, Indiana, for purposes of 135
awarding grants or scholarships to residents of Ohio who attend 136
the university. The university shall not use any of the funds it 137
receives for purposes of administering the scholarship program. 138
The registrar shall enter into appropriate agreements with the 139
university of Notre Dame to effectuate the distribution of such 140
funds as provided in this section. 141
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 142
receives pursuant to section 4503.516 of the Revised Code to 143
Marshall university in Huntington, West Virginia, for purposes 144
of awarding grants or scholarships to residents of Ohio who 145
attend the university. The university shall not use any of the 146
funds it receives for purposes of administering the scholarship 147
program. The registrar shall enter into appropriate agreements 148
with Marshall university to effectuate the distribution of such 149
funds as provided in this section. 150
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 151
receives pursuant to section 4503.517 of the Revised Code to the 152
university of Alabama in Tuscaloosa, Alabama, for purposes of 153
awarding grants or scholarships to residents of Ohio who attend 154
the university. The university shall not use any of the funds it 155
receives for purposes of administering the scholarship program. 156
The registrar shall enter into appropriate agreements with the 157
university of Alabama to effectuate the distribution of such 158
funds as provided in this section. 159
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 160
receives pursuant to section 4503.518 of the Revised Code to the 161
Nationwide children's hospital, which shall use the 162
contributions for the "On Our Sleeves" campaign. 163
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 164

H. B. No. 419 Page 7
As Introduced
receives pursuant to section 4503.519 of the Revised Code 165
equally to NAMI Ohio (national alliance on mental illness of 166
Ohio), Ohio peer recovery organizations, and OCAAR (Ohio citizen 167
advocates for addiction recovery). 168
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 169
receives pursuant to section 4503.520 of the Revised Code to 170
Purdue university in West Lafayette, Indiana, for purposes of 171
awarding grants or scholarships to residents of Ohio who attend 172
the university. The university shall not use any of the funds it 173
receives for purposes of administering the scholarship program. 174
The registrar shall enter into appropriate agreements with 175
Purdue university to effectuate the distribution of such funds 176
as provided in this section. 177
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 178
receives pursuant to section 4503.521 of the Revised Code to the 179
Ohio bicycle federation to assist that organization in paying 180
for the educational programs it sponsors in support of Ohio 181
cyclists of all ages. 182
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 183
receives pursuant to section 4503.522 of the Revised Code to the 184
"friends of Perry's victory and international peace memorial, 185
incorporated," a nonprofit corporation organized under the laws 186
of this state, to assist that organization in paying the 187
expenses it incurs in sponsoring or holding charitable, 188
educational, and cultural events at the monument. 189
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 190
receives pursuant to section 4503.523 of the Revised Code to the 191
fairport lights foundation, which shall use the money to pay for 192
the restoration, maintenance, and preservation of the 193
lighthouses of fairport harbor. 194

H. B. No. 419 Page 8
As Introduced
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 195
receives pursuant to section 4503.524 of the Revised Code to the 196
Massillon tiger football booster club, which shall use the 197
contributions only to promote and support the football team of 198
Washington high school of the Massillon city school district. 199
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 200
receives pursuant to section 4503.525 of the Revised Code to the 201
United States power squadron district seven which shall annually 202
distribute the contributions in equal amounts to all United 203
States power squadrons located in the state. Each power squadron 204
district shall use the money it receives under this section to 205
pay for the educational boating programs each district holds or 206
sponsors within this state. 207
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 208
receives pursuant to section 4503.526 of the Revised Code to the 209
Ohio district Kiwanis foundation of the Ohio district of Kiwanis 210
international, which shall use the money it receives under this 211
section to pay the costs of its educational and humanitarian 212
activities. 213
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 214
receives pursuant to section 4503.528 of the Revised Code to the 215
Ohio children's alliance, which shall use the money it receives 216
under this section to pay the expenses it incurs in advancing 217
its mission of sustainably improving the provision of services 218
to children, young adults, and families in this state. 219
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 220
receives pursuant to section 4503.529 of the Revised Code to the 221
Ohio nurses foundation. The foundation shall use the money it 222
receives under this section to provide educational scholarships 223
to assist individuals who aspire to join the nursing profession, 224

H. B. No. 419 Page 9
As Introduced
to assist nurses in the nursing profession who seek to advance 225
their education, and to support persons conducting nursing 226
research concerning the evidence-based practice of nursing and 227
the improvement of patient outcomes. 228
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 229
receives pursuant to section 4503.53 of the Revised Code to the 230
Indiana Kentucky Ohio regional council of carpenters. The 231
council shall use the money it receives to assist its members 232
who are experiencing financial hardship. 233
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 234
receives pursuant to section 4503.531 of the Revised Code to the 235
thank you foundation, incorporated, a nonprofit corporation 236
organized under the laws of this state, to assist that 237
organization in paying for the charitable activities and 238
programs it sponsors in support of United States military 239
personnel, veterans, and their families. 240
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 241
receives pursuant to section 4503.532 of the Revised Code to the 242
Ohio history connection, which shall use the contributions for 243
the benefit of the Paul Laurence Dunbar house. 244
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 245
receives pursuant to section 4503.533 of the Revised Code to the 246
nonprofit organization Ohio conference of teamsters and industry 247
health and welfare fund, which shall use the contributions to 248
further the nonprofit's mission. 249
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 250
receives pursuant to section 4503.534 of the Revised Code to the 251
disabled American veterans department of Ohio, to be used for 252
programs that serve disabled American veterans and their 253

H. B. No. 419 Page 10
As Introduced
families. 254
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 255
receives pursuant to section 4503.536 of the Revised Code to 256
save a warrior, incorporated, which shall use the contributions 257
to prevent suicide by active members of the armed forces of the 258
United States, veterans of those armed forces, and first 259
responders. 260
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 261
receives pursuant to section 4503.542 of the Revised Code to the 262
Ohio craft brewers association. 263
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 264
receives pursuant to section 4503.541 of the Revised Code to 265
Dolly Parton's imagination library of Ohio. The library shall 266
use the money it receives under this section for operational 267
costs, including the distribution of books. 268
The registrar shall pay the contributions that are paid to 269
the registrar pursuant to section 4503.545 of the Revised Code 270
to the national rifle association foundation, which shall use 271
the money to pay the costs of the educational activities and 272
programs the foundation holds or sponsors in this state. 273
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 274
receives pursuant to section 4503.55 of the Revised Code to the 275
pro football hall of fame, which shall deposit the contributions 276
into a special bank account that it establishes and which shall 277
be separate and distinct from any other account the pro football 278
hall of fame maintains, to be used exclusively for the purpose 279
of promoting the pro football hall of fame as a travel 280
destination. 281
The registrar shall pay to the Ohio pet fund the 282

H. B. No. 419 Page 11
As Introduced
contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 283
4503.551 of the Revised Code and any other money from any other 284
source, including donations, gifts, and grants, that is 285
designated by the source to be paid to the Ohio pet fund. The 286
Ohio pet fund shall use the moneys it receives under this 287
section to support programs for the sterilization of dogs and 288
cats and for educational programs concerning the proper 289
veterinary care of those animals, and for expenses of the Ohio 290
pet fund that are reasonably necessary for it to obtain and 291
maintain its tax-exempt status and to perform its duties. 292
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 293
receives pursuant to section 4503.552 of the Revised Code to the 294
rock and roll hall of fame and museum, incorporated. 295
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 296
receives pursuant to section 4503.553 of the Revised Code to the 297
Ohio coalition for animals, incorporated, a nonprofit 298
corporation. Except as provided in division (B) of this section, 299
the coalition shall distribute the money to its members, and the 300
members shall use the money only to pay for educational, 301
charitable, and other programs of each coalition member that 302
provide care for unwanted, abused, and neglected horses. The 303
Ohio coalition for animals may use a portion of the money to pay 304
for reasonable marketing costs incurred in the design and 305
promotion of the license plate and for administrative costs 306
incurred in the disbursement and management of funds received 307
under this section. 308
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 309
receives pursuant to section 4503.554 of the Revised Code to the 310
Ohio state council of the knights of Columbus, which shall use 311
the contributions to pay for its charitable activities and 312

H. B. No. 419 Page 12
As Introduced
programs. 313
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 314
receives pursuant to section 4503.555 of the Revised Code to the 315
western reserve historical society, which shall use the 316
contributions to fund the Crawford auto aviation museum. 317
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 318
receives pursuant to section 4503.556 of the Revised Code to the 319
Erica J. Holloman foundation, inc., for the awareness of triple 320
negative breast cancer. The foundation shall use the 321
contributions for charitable and educational purposes. 322
The registrar shall pay each contribution the registrar 323
receives pursuant to section 4503.557 of the Revised Code to the 324
central Ohio chapter of the Ronald McDonald house charities, 325
which shall distribute the contribution to the chapter of the 326
Ronald McDonald house charities in whose geographic territory 327
the person who paid the contribution resides. 328
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 329
receives pursuant to section 4503.559 of the Revised Code to 330
playhouse square, located in Cleveland, Ohio, which shall use 331
the contributions to further its mission of presenting and 332
producing a wide variety of quality performing arts, advancing 333
arts education, and creating a superior destination for 334
entertainment, business, and residential living. 335
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 336
receives pursuant to section 4503.561 of the Revised Code to the 337
state of Ohio chapter of ducks unlimited, inc., which shall 338
deposit the contributions into a special bank account that it 339
establishes. The special bank account shall be separate and 340
distinct from any other account the state of Ohio chapter of 341

H. B. No. 419 Page 13
As Introduced
ducks unlimited, inc., maintains and shall be used exclusively 342
for the purpose of protecting, enhancing, restoring, and 343
managing wetlands and conserving wildlife habitat. The state of 344
Ohio chapter of ducks unlimited, inc., annually shall notify the 345
registrar in writing of the name, address, and account to which 346
such payments are to be made. 347
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 348
receives pursuant to section 4503.562 of the Revised Code to the 349
Mahoning river consortium, which shall use the money to pay the 350
expenses it incurs in restoring and maintaining the Mahoning 351
river watershed. 352
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 353
receives pursuant to section 4503.564 of the Revised Code to the 354
Glen Helen association to pay expenses related to the Glen Helen 355
nature preserve. 356
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 357
receives pursuant to section 4503.565 of the Revised Code to the 358
conservancy for Cuyahoga valley national park, which shall use 359
the money in support of the park. 360
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 361
receives pursuant to section 4503.566 of the Revised Code to the 362
Ottawa national wildlife refuge, which shall use the 363
contributions for wildlife preservation purposes. 364
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 365
receives pursuant to section 4503.567 of the Revised Code to the 366
girls on the run of Franklin county, inc., which shall use the 367
contributions to support the activities of the organization. 368
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 369
receives pursuant to section 4503.569 of the Revised Code to the 370

H. B. No. 419 Page 14
As Introduced
Ohio bird sanctuary, located in Mansfield, Ohio, which shall use 371
the contributions for purposes of its operations, bird care and 372
rehabilitation, and educational programs. 373
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 374
receives pursuant to section 4503.576 of the Revised Code to the 375
Ohio state beekeepers association, which shall use those 376
contributions to promote beekeeping, provide educational 377
information about beekeeping, and to support other state and 378
local beekeeping programs. 379
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 380
receives pursuant to section 4503.577 of the Revised Code to the 381
national aviation hall of fame, which shall use the 382
contributions to fulfill its mission of honoring aerospace 383
legends to inspire future leaders. 384
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 385
receives pursuant to section 4503.578 of the Revised Code to 386
keep Ohio beautiful, incorporated, which shall use the 387
contributions towards its mission of empowering Ohio communities 388
to take greater responsibility for improving the local 389
environment through litter prevention, beautification, community 390
greening, waste reduction, and recycling. 391
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 392
receives pursuant to section 4503.579 of the Revised Code to the 393
national council of negro women, incorporated, which shall use 394
the contributions for educational purposes. 395
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 396
receives pursuant to section 4503.581 of the Revised Code to the 397
Ohio past detachment commander's club, inc., which shall use the 398
contributions to support the activities of the organization. 399

H. B. No. 419 Page 15
As Introduced
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 400
receives pursuant to section 4503.582 of the Revised Code to the 401
progressive animal welfare society adoption center, inc., which 402
shall use the contributions to support the activities of the 403
center. 404
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 405
receives pursuant to section 4503.583 of the Revised Code to the 406
American legion, department of Ohio, inc., which shall use the 407
contributions to support the activities of the organization. 408
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 409
receives pursuant to section 4503.584 of the Revised Code to the 410
Ohio natural energy foundation to fund scholarships for students 411
pursuing careers in the oil and natural gas industry. 412
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 413
receives pursuant to section 4503.585 of the Revised Code to the 414
Terrace Park recreation committee, inc. to offer scholarships to 415
young athletes of, and maintain athletic facilities in, the 416
municipal corporation of Terrace Park. 417
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 418
receives pursuant to section 4503.586 of the Revised Code to the 419
Ohio mountain bike alliance. 420
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 421
receives pursuant to section 4503.588 of the Revised Code to the 422
Ohio grange patrons of husbandry foundation, which shall use the 423
contributions to support the activities of the organization. 424
The registrar shall pay to a sports commission created 425
pursuant to section 4503.591 of the Revised Code each 426
contribution the registrar receives under that section that an 427
applicant pays to obtain license plates that bear the logo of a 428

H. B. No. 419 Page 16
As Introduced
professional sports team located in the county of that sports 429
commission and that is participating in the license plate 430
program pursuant to division (E) of that section, irrespective 431
of the county of residence of an applicant. 432
The registrar shall pay to a community charity each 433
contribution the registrar receives under section 4503.591 of 434
the Revised Code that an applicant pays to obtain license plates 435
that bear the logo of a professional sports team that is 436
participating in the license plate program pursuant to division 437
(G) of that section. 438
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 439
receives pursuant to section 4503.592 of the Revised Code to 440
pollinator partnership's monarch wings across Ohio program, 441
which shall use the contributions for the protection and 442
preservation of the monarch butterfly and pollinator corridor in 443
Ohio and for educational programs. 444
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 445
receives pursuant to section 4503.594 of the Revised Code to 446
pelotonia, which shall use the contributions for the purpose of 447
supporting cancer research. 448
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 449
receives pursuant to section 4503.595 of the Revised Code to the 450
Stan Hywet hall and gardens. 451
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 452
receives pursuant to section 4503.596 of the Revised Code to the 453
Cuyahoga valley scenic railroad. 454
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 455
receives pursuant to section 4503.597 of the Revised Code to the 456
Circleville pumpkin show, incorporated, which shall use the 457

H. B. No. 419 Page 17
As Introduced
contributions to promote good will surrounding the Circleville 458
pumpkin show as a nonprofit annual event. 459
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 460
receives pursuant to section 4503.598 of the Revised Code 461
equally to the Jackson local schools foundation and the Jackson 462
high school alumni association. The foundation and alumni 463
association shall use the contributions for the foundation's and 464
alumni association's purposes. 465
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 466
receives pursuant to section 4503.67 of the Revised Code to the 467
Dan Beard council of the boy scouts of America. The council 468
shall distribute all contributions in an equitable manner 469
throughout the state to regional councils of the boy scouts. 470
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 471
receives pursuant to section 4503.68 of the Revised Code to the 472
girl scouts of Ohio's heartland. The girl scouts of Ohio's 473
heartland shall distribute all contributions in an equitable 474
manner throughout the state to regional councils of the girl 475
scouts. 476
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 477
receives pursuant to section 4503.69 of the Revised Code to the 478
Dan Beard council of the boy scouts of America. The council 479
shall distribute all contributions in an equitable manner 480
throughout the state to regional councils of the boy scouts. 481
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 482
receives pursuant to section 4503.70 of the Revised Code to the 483
charitable foundation of the grand lodge of Ohio, f. & a. m., 484
which shall use the contributions for scholarship purposes. 485
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 486

H. B. No. 419 Page 18
As Introduced
receives pursuant to section 4503.701 of the Revised Code to the 487
Prince Hall grand lodge of free and accepted masons of Ohio, 488
which shall use the contributions for scholarship purposes. 489
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 490
receives pursuant to section 4503.702 of the Revised Code to the 491
Ohio Association of the Improved Benevolent and Protective Order 492
of the Elks of the World, which shall use the funds for 493
charitable purposes. 494
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 495
receives pursuant to section 4503.703 of the Revised Code to the 496
Ohio state moose association. 497
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 498
receives pursuant to section 4503.704 of the Revised Code to the 499
Antioch shrine foundation located in the municipal corporation 500
of Dayton. 501
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 502
receives pursuant to section 4503.71 of the Revised Code to the 503
fraternal order of police of Ohio, incorporated, which shall 504
deposit the fees into its general account to be used for 505
purposes of the fraternal order of police of Ohio, incorporated. 506
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 507
receives pursuant to section 4503.711 of the Revised Code to the 508
fraternal order of police of Ohio, incorporated, which shall 509
deposit the contributions into an account that it creates to be 510
used for the purpose of advancing and protecting the law 511
enforcement profession, promoting improved law enforcement 512
methods, and teaching respect for law and order. 513
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 514
pursuant to section 4503.712 of the Revised Code to Ohio 515

H. B. No. 419 Page 19
As Introduced
concerns of police survivors, which shall use those 516
contributions to provide whatever assistance may be appropriate 517
to the families of Ohio law enforcement officers who are killed 518
in the line of duty. 519
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 520
pursuant to section 4503.713 of the Revised Code to the greater 521
Cleveland peace officers memorial society, which shall use those 522
contributions to honor law enforcement officers who have died in 523
the line of duty and support its charitable purposes. 524
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 525
pursuant to section 4503.714 of the Revised Code to the Ohio 526
association of chiefs of police. 527
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 528
receives, or has received, pursuant to section 4503.715 of the 529
Revised Code to the community foundation of Ohio's electric 530
cooperatives, which shall use the contributions to recognize and 531
memorialize fallen or injured lineworkers and support their 532
families. 533
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 534
receives pursuant to section 4503.716 of the Revised Code to the 535
fallen timbers battlefield preservation commission, which shall 536
use the contributions to further the mission of the commission. 537
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 538
receives pursuant to section 4503.72 of the Revised Code to the 539
organization known on March 31, 2003, as the Ohio CASA/GAL 540
association, a private, nonprofit corporation organized under 541
Chapter 1702. of the Revised Code. The Ohio CASA/GAL association 542
shall use these contributions to pay the expenses it incurs in 543
administering a program to secure the proper representation in 544

H. B. No. 419 Page 20
As Introduced
the courts of this state of abused, neglected, and dependent 545
children, and for the training and supervision of persons 546
participating in that program. 547
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 548
receives pursuant to section 4503.722 of the Revised Code to the 549
Down Syndrome Association of Central Ohio, which shall use the 550
contributions for advocacy purposes throughout the state. 551
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 552
receives pursuant to section 4503.724 of the Revised Code to the 553
Ohio Chapter of the American Foundation for Suicide Prevention, 554
which shall use the contributions for programs, education, and 555
advocacy purposes throughout the state. 556
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 557
receives pursuant to section 4503.726 of the Revised Code to the 558
Ohio suicide prevention foundation, which shall use the 559
contributions for suicide prevention programs, education, and 560
advocacy. 561
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 562
receives pursuant to section 4503.727 of the Revised Code to 563
Save22, which shall use the contributions for any purpose 564
determined necessary by the organization. 565
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 566
receives, or has received, pursuant to section 4503.725 of the 567
Revised Code to the ALS united Ohio, incorporated, which shall 568
split the contributions between that organization and the ALS 569
association in accordance with any agreement between the two 570
organizations. The contributions shall be used to discover 571
treatments and a cure for ALS, and to serve, advocate for, and 572
empower people affected by ALS to live their lives to the 573

H. B. No. 419 Page 21
As Introduced
fullest. 574
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 575
receives pursuant to section 4503.73 of the Revised Code to 576
Wright B. Flyer, incorporated, which shall deposit the 577
contributions into its general account to be used for purposes 578
of Wright B. Flyer, incorporated. 579
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 580
receives pursuant to section 4503.732 of the Revised Code to the 581
Siegel Shuster society, a nonprofit organization dedicated to 582
commemorating and celebrating the creation of Superman in 583
Cleveland, Ohio. 584
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 585
receives pursuant to section 4503.733 of the Revised Code to the 586
central Ohio chapter of the juvenile diabetes research 587
foundation, which shall distribute the contributions to the 588
chapters of the juvenile diabetes research foundation in whose 589
geographic territory the person who paid the contribution 590
resides. 591
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 592
receives pursuant to section 4503.734 of the Revised Code to the 593
Ohio highway patrol auxiliary foundation, which shall use the 594
contributions to fulfill the foundation's mission of supporting 595
law enforcement education and assistance. 596
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 597
receives pursuant to section 4503.735 of the Revised Code to the 598
heart4seniors/healthcare evolution alert response technology 599
foundation, inc., which shall use the contributions for purposes 600
of the foundation's mission. 601
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 602

H. B. No. 419 Page 22
As Introduced
receives pursuant to section 4503.74 of the Revised Code to the 603
Columbus zoological park association, which shall disburse the 604
moneys to Ohio's major metropolitan zoos, as defined in section 605
4503.74 of the Revised Code, in accordance with a written 606
agreement entered into by the major metropolitan zoos. 607
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 608
receives pursuant to section 4503.741 of the Revised Code to the 609
Ohio house rabbit rescue, which shall use the contributions for 610
its rescue, adoption, and educational programs. 611
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 612
receives pursuant to section 4503.75 of the Revised Code to the 613
rotary foundation, located on March 31, 2003, in Evanston, 614
Illinois, to be placed in a fund known as the permanent fund and 615
used to endow educational and humanitarian programs of the 616
rotary foundation. 617
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 618
receives pursuant to section 4503.751 of the Revised Code to the 619
Ohio association of realtors, which shall deposit the 620
contributions into a property disaster relief fund maintained 621
under the Ohio realtors charitable and education foundation. 622
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 623
receives pursuant to section 4503.752 of the Revised Code to 624
buckeye corvettes, incorporated, which shall use the 625
contributions to pay for its charitable activities and programs. 626
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 627
receives pursuant to section 4503.754 of the Revised Code to the 628
municipal corporation of Twinsburg. 629
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 630
receives pursuant to section 4503.755 of the Revised Code to the 631

H. B. No. 419 Page 23
As Introduced
little brown jug society to assist the society in maintaining, 632
promulgating, and operating the little brown jug as part of 633
Ohio's rich harness racing history. 634
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 635
receives pursuant to section 4503.763 of the Revised Code to the 636
Ohio history connection to be used solely to build, support, and 637
maintain the Ohio battleflag collection within the Ohio history 638
connection. 639
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 640
receives pursuant to section 4503.764 of the Revised Code to the 641
Medina county historical society, which shall use those 642
contributions to distribute between the various historical 643
societies and museums in Medina county. 644
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 645
receives pursuant to section 4503.765 of the Revised Code to the 646
Amaranth grand chapter foundation, which shall use the 647
contributions for communal outreach, charitable service, and 648
scholarship purposes. 649
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 650
receives pursuant to section 4503.766 of the Revised Code to the 651
Ohio society daughters of the American revolution, which shall 652
deposit the contributions into its general account to be used 653
for continuing the organization's endeavors in service, historic 654
preservation, education, and patriotism. 655
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 656
receives pursuant to section 4503.767 of the Revised Code to 657
folds of honor of central Ohio, which shall use the 658
contributions to provide scholarships to spouses and children 659
either of disabled veterans or of members of any branch of the 660

H. B. No. 419 Page 24
As Introduced
armed forces who died during their service. 661
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 662
receives pursuant to section 4503.85 of the Revised Code to the 663
Ohio sea grant college program to be used for Lake Erie area 664
research projects. 665
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 666
receives pursuant to section 4503.851 of the Revised Code to 667
West Virginia university in Morgantown, West Virginia for 668
purposes of awarding grants or scholarships to residents of Ohio 669
who attend the university. The university shall not use any of 670
the funds it receives for purposes of administering the 671
scholarship program. The registrar shall enter into appropriate 672
agreements with West Virginia university to effectuate the 673
distribution of such funds as provided in this section. 674
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 675
receives pursuant to section 4503.86 of the Revised Code to the 676
Ohio Lincoln highway historic byway, which shall use those 677
contributions solely to promote and support the historical 678
preservation and advertisement of the Lincoln highway in this 679
state. 680
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 681
receives pursuant to section 4503.87 of the Revised Code to the 682
Grove City little league dream field fund, which shall use those 683
contributions solely to build, maintain, and improve youth 684
baseball fields within the municipal corporation of Grove City. 685
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 686
receives pursuant to section 4503.871 of the Revised Code to the 687
Solon city school district. The school district shall use the 688
contributions it receives to pay the expenses it incurs in 689

H. B. No. 419 Page 25
As Introduced
providing services to the school district's students that assist 690
in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being 691
of the students. The services provided may include bereavement 692
counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, 693
sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of 694
students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, 695
suicide prevention, and human trafficking. The school district 696
superintendent or, in the school district superintendent's 697
discretion, the appropriate school principal or appropriate 698
school counselors shall determine any charitable organizations 699
that the school district hires to provide those services. The 700
school district also may use the contributions it receives to 701
pay for members of the faculty of the school district to receive 702
training in providing such services to the students of the 703
school district. The school district shall ensure that any 704
charitable organization that is hired by the district is exempt 705
from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the 706
Internal Revenue Code. The school district shall not use the 707
contributions it receives for any other purpose. 708
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 709
receives pursuant to section 4503.872 of the Revised Code to the 710
Canton city school district. The district may use the 711
contributions for student welfare, but shall not use the 712
contributions for any political purpose or to pay salaries of 713
district employees. 714
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 715
receives pursuant to section 4503.873 of the Revised Code to 716
Padua Franciscan high school located in the municipal 717
corporation of Parma. The school shall use fifty per cent of the 718
contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its 719
students. The school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to 720

H. B. No. 419 Page 26
As Introduced
pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's 721
students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and 722
emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may 723
include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving 724
techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and 725
education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug 726
abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of 727
providing such services, the school may pay for members of the 728
faculty of the school to receive training in providing those 729
services. The school principal or, in the school principal's 730
discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any 731
charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those 732
services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable 733
organization is exempt from federal income taxation under 734
subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school 735
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 736
purpose. 737
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 738
receives pursuant to section 4503.874 of the Revised Code to St. 739
Edward high school located in the municipal corporation of 740
Lakewood. The school shall use fifty per cent of the 741
contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its 742
students. The school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to 743
pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's 744
students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and 745
emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may 746
include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving 747
techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and 748
education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug 749
abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of 750
providing such services, the school may pay for members of the 751

H. B. No. 419 Page 27
As Introduced
faculty of the school to receive training in providing those 752
services. The school principal or, in the school principal's 753
discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any 754
charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those 755
services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable 756
organization is exempt from federal income taxation under 757
subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school 758
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 759
purpose. 760
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 761
receives pursuant to section 4503.875 of the Revised Code to 762
Walsh Jesuit high school located in the municipal corporation of 763
Cuyahoga Falls. The school shall use fifty per cent of the 764
contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its 765
students. The school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to 766
pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's 767
students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and 768
emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may 769
include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving 770
techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and 771
education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug 772
abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of 773
providing such services, the school may pay for members of the 774
faculty of the school to receive training in providing those 775
services. The school principal or, in the school principal's 776
discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any 777
charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those 778
services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable 779
organization is exempt from federal income taxation under 780
subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school 781
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 782

H. B. No. 419 Page 28
As Introduced
purpose. 783
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 784
receives pursuant to section 4503.876 of the Revised Code to the 785
North Royalton city school district. The school district shall 786
use the contributions it receives to pay the expenses it incurs 787
in providing services to the school district's students that 788
assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional 789
well-being of the students. The services provided may include 790
bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving 791
techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and 792
education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug 793
abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. The school 794
district superintendent or, in the school district 795
superintendent's discretion, the appropriate school principal or 796
appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable 797
organizations that the school district hires to provide those 798
services. The school district also may use the contributions it 799
receives to pay for members of the faculty of the school 800
district to receive training in providing such services to the 801
students of the school district. The school district shall 802
ensure that any charitable organization that is hired by the 803
district is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 804
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school district 805
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 806
purpose. 807
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 808
receives pursuant to section 4503.877 of the Revised Code to the 809
Independence local school district. The school district shall 810
use the contributions it receives to pay the expenses it incurs 811
in providing services to the school district's students that 812
assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional 813

H. B. No. 419 Page 29
As Introduced
well-being of the students. The services provided may include 814
bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving 815
techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and 816
education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug 817
abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. The school 818
district superintendent or, in the school district 819
superintendent's discretion, the appropriate school principal or 820
appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable 821
organizations that the school district hires to provide those 822
services. The school district also may use the contributions it 823
receives to pay for members of the faculty of the school 824
district to receive training in providing such services to the 825
students of the school district. The school district shall 826
ensure that any charitable organization that is hired by the 827
district is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 828
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school district 829
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 830
purpose. 831
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 832
receives pursuant to section 4503.878 of the Revised Code to the 833
Cuyahoga Heights local school district. The school district 834
shall use the contributions it receives to pay the expenses it 835
incurs in providing services to the school district's students 836
that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and 837
emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may 838
include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving 839
techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and 840
education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug 841
abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. The school 842
district superintendent or, in the school district 843
superintendent's discretion, the appropriate school principal or 844

H. B. No. 419 Page 30
As Introduced
appropriate school counselors, shall determine any charitable 845
organizations that the school district hires to provide those 846
services. The school district also may use the contributions it 847
receives to pay for members of the faculty of the school 848
district to receive training in providing such services to the 849
students of the school district. The school district shall 850
ensure that any charitable organization that is hired by the 851
district is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 852
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school district 853
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 854
purpose. 855
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 856
receives pursuant to section 4503.879 of the Revised Code to the 857
west technical high school alumni association, which shall use 858
the contributions for activities sponsored by the association. 859
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 860
receives pursuant to section 4503.88 of the Revised Code to the 861
Kenston local school district. The school district shall use the 862
contributions it receives to pay the expenses it incurs in 863
providing services that assist in developing or maintaining a 864
culture of environmental responsibility and an innovative 865
science, technology, engineering, art, and math (S.T.E.A.M.) 866
curriculum to the school district's students. The school 867
district shall not use the contributions it receives for any 868
other purpose. 869
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 870
receives pursuant to section 4503.881 of the Revised Code to La 871
Salle high school in the municipal corporation of Cincinnati. 872
The high school shall not use the contributions it receives for 873
any political purpose. 874

H. B. No. 419 Page 31
As Introduced
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 875
receives pursuant to section 4503.882 of the Revised Code to St. 876
John's Jesuit high school and academy located in the municipal 877
corporation of Toledo. The school shall use the contributions it 878
receives to provide tuition assistance for students attending 879
the school. 880
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 881
receives pursuant to section 4503.883 of the Revised Code to St. 882
Charles preparatory school located in the municipal corporation 883
of Columbus, which shall use the contributions for the school's 884
alumni association and the alumni association's purposes. 885
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 886
receives pursuant to section 4503.884 of the Revised Code to 887
Archbishop Moeller high school located in the municipal 888
corporation of Cincinnati. The high school shall not use the 889
contributions it receives for any political purpose. 890
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 891
receives pursuant to section 4503.885 of the Revised Code to the 892
Revere schools foundation. The foundation shall use the 893
contributions to promote its mission, including awarding 894
scholarships to honor young people who are meaningfully engaged 895
in their school or community. The foundation shall not use the 896
contributions for any political purpose. 897
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 898
receives pursuant to section 4503.886 of the Revised Code to 899
Stephen T. Badin high school in the municipal corporation of 900
Hamilton. 901
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 902
receives pursuant to section 4503.887 of the Revised Code to 903

H. B. No. 419 Page 32
As Introduced
Bishop Hartley high school located in the municipal corporation 904
of Columbus, which shall use the contributions for the school's 905
alumni association and the alumni association's purposes. 906
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 907
receives pursuant to section 4503.888 of the Revised Code to St. 908
Vincent-St. Mary high school located in the municipal 909
corporation of Akron. 910
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 911
receives pursuant to section 4503.89 of the Revised Code to the 912
American red cross of greater Columbus on behalf of the Ohio 913
chapters of the American red cross, which shall use the 914
contributions for disaster readiness, preparedness, and response 915
programs on a statewide basis. 916
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 917
receives pursuant to section 4503.891 of the Revised Code to the 918
Ohio lions foundation. The foundation shall use the 919
contributions for charitable and educational purposes. 920
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 921
receives pursuant to section 4503.892 of the Revised Code to the 922
Hudson city school district. The school district shall not use 923
the contributions it receives for any political purpose. 924
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 925
receives pursuant to section 4503.893 of the Revised Code to the 926
Harrison Central jr./sr. high school located in the municipal 927
corporation of Cadiz. 928
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 929
receives pursuant to section 4503.894 of the Revised Code to the 930
Blanchester schools foundation for funding student scholarships 931
and for funding activities and programs for at-risk students. 932

H. B. No. 419 Page 33
As Introduced
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 933
receives pursuant to section 4503.895 of the Revised Code to the 934
Lakeside Chautauqua foundation. The foundation shall use the 935
contributions it receives for conservation and preservation of 936
Lake Erie and the surrounding ecosystem. 937
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 938
receives pursuant to section 4503.896 of the Revised Code to the 939
American legion auxiliary department of Ohio. The auxiliary 940
department shall use the contributions it receives to support 941
the American legion, current and former military members, and 942
their families. 943
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 944
receives pursuant to section 4503.899 of the Revised Code to the 945
Cleveland clinic foundation, which shall use the contributions 946
to support Cleveland clinic children's education, research, and 947
patient services. 948
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 949
receives pursuant to section 4503.90 of the Revised Code to the 950
nationwide children's hospital foundation. 951
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 952
receives pursuant to section 4503.901 of the Revised Code to the 953
Ohio association for pupil transportation, which shall use the 954
money to support transportation programs, provide training to 955
school transportation professionals, and support other 956
initiatives for school transportation safety. 957
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 958
receives pursuant to section 4503.902 of the Revised Code to St. 959
Ignatius high school located in the municipal corporation of 960
Cleveland. The school shall use fifty per cent of the 961

H. B. No. 419 Page 34
As Introduced
contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its 962
students. The school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to 963
pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's 964
students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and 965
emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may 966
include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving 967
techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and 968
education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug 969
abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of 970
providing such services, the school may pay for members of the 971
faculty of the school to receive training in providing those 972
services. The school principal or, in the school principal's 973
discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any 974
charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those 975
services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable 976
organization is exempt from federal income taxation under 977
subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school 978
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 979
purpose. 980
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 981
receives pursuant to section 4503.903 of the Revised Code to the 982
Brecksville-Broadview Heights city school district. The school 983
district shall use the contributions it receives to pay the 984
expenses it incurs in providing services to the school 985
district's students that assist in developing or maintaining the 986
mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services 987
provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in 988
defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the 989
counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating 990
violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. 991
The school district superintendent or, in the school district 992

H. B. No. 419 Page 35
As Introduced
superintendent's discretion, the appropriate school principal or 993
appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable 994
organizations that the school district hires to provide those 995
services. The school district also may use the contributions it 996
receives to pay for members of the faculty of the school 997
district to receive training in providing such services to the 998
students of the school district. The school district shall 999
ensure that any charitable organization that is hired by the 1000
district is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 1001
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school district 1002
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 1003
purpose. 1004
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1005
receives pursuant to section 4503.904 of the Revised Code to the 1006
Chagrin Falls exempted village school district. The school 1007
district shall use the contributions it receives to pay the 1008
expenses it incurs in providing services to the school 1009
district's students that assist in developing or maintaining the 1010
mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services 1011
provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in 1012
defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the 1013
counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating 1014
violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. 1015
The school district superintendent or, in the school district 1016
superintendent's discretion, the appropriate school principal or 1017
appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable 1018
organizations that the school district hires to provide those 1019
services. The school district also may use the contributions it 1020
receives to pay for members of the faculty of the school 1021
district to receive training in providing such services to the 1022
students of the school district. The school district shall 1023

H. B. No. 419 Page 36
As Introduced
ensure that any charitable organization that is hired by the 1024
district is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 1025
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school district 1026
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 1027
purpose. 1028
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1029
receives pursuant to section 4503.905 of the Revised Code to the 1030
Cuyahoga valley career center. The career center shall use the 1031
contributions it receives to pay the expenses it incurs in 1032
providing services to the career center's students that assist 1033
in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being 1034
of the students. The services provided may include bereavement 1035
counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, 1036
sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of 1037
students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, 1038
suicide prevention, and human trafficking. The career center's 1039
superintendent or in the career center's superintendent's 1040
discretion, the school board or appropriate school counselors 1041
shall determine any charitable organizations that the career 1042
center hires to provide those services. The career center also 1043
may use the contributions it receives to pay for members of the 1044
faculty of the career center to receive training in providing 1045
such services to the students of the career center. The career 1046
center shall ensure that any charitable organization that is 1047
hired by the career center is exempt from federal income 1048
taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue 1049
Code. The career center shall not use the contributions it 1050
receives for any other purpose. 1051
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1052
receives pursuant to section 4503.906 of the Revised Code to the 1053
Stow-Munroe Falls city school district. The school district 1054

H. B. No. 419 Page 37
As Introduced
shall not use the contributions it receives for any political 1055
purpose. 1056
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1057
receives pursuant to section 4503.907 of the Revised Code to the 1058
Twinsburg city school district. The school district shall not 1059
use the contributions it receives for any political purpose. 1060
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1061
receives pursuant to section 4503.908 of the Revised Code to St. 1062
Xavier high school located in Springfield township in Hamilton 1063
county. The school shall use fifty per cent of the contributions 1064
it receives to provide tuition assistance to its students. The 1065
school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to pay the 1066
expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's 1067
students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and 1068
emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may 1069
include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving 1070
techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and 1071
education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug 1072
abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of 1073
providing such services, the school may pay for members of the 1074
faculty of the school to receive training in providing those 1075
services. The school principal or, in the school principal's 1076
discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any 1077
charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those 1078
services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable 1079
organization is exempt from federal income taxation under 1080
subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school 1081
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 1082
purpose. 1083
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1084

H. B. No. 419 Page 38
As Introduced
receives pursuant to section 4503.909 of the Revised Code to the 1085
Grandview Heights city school district, which shall use the 1086
contributions for its gifted programs and special education and 1087
related services. 1088
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 1089
pursuant to section 4503.92 of the Revised Code to support our 1090
troops, incorporated, a national nonprofit corporation, which 1091
shall use those contributions in accordance with its articles of 1092
incorporation and for the benefit of servicemembers of the armed 1093
forces of the United States and their families when they are in 1094
financial need. 1095
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 1096
pursuant to section 4503.931 of the Revised Code to healthy New 1097
Albany, which shall use the contributions for its community 1098
programs, events, and other activities. 1099
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1100
receives pursuant to section 4503.932 of the Revised Code to 1101
habitat for humanity of Ohio, inc., which shall use the 1102
contributions for its projects related to building affordable 1103
houses. 1104
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1105
receives pursuant to section 4503.933 of the Revised Code to 1106
Ohio citizens for the arts foundation, which shall use the 1107
contributions for advocacy, education, and professional 1108
development programs. 1109
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1110
receives pursuant to section 4503.934 of the Revised Code to 1111
Ohio society for respiratory care of the American association 1112
for respiratory care, incorporated, which shall use the 1113

H. B. No. 419 Page 39
As Introduced
contributions to benefit the Ohio society for respiratory care 1114
student scholarship fund. 1115
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1116
receives pursuant to section 4503.935 of the Revised Code to 1117
Jesup W. Scott high school's principal activities fund. The high 1118
school shall use the contributions to enhance learning 1119
opportunities for the high school's students. 1120
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1121
receives pursuant to section 4503.936 of the Revised Code to the 1122
Hilliard Davidson baseball club, which shall use the 1123
contributions to support the team. 1124
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1125
receives pursuant to section 4503.94 of the Revised Code to the 1126
Michelle's leading star foundation, which shall use the money 1127
solely to fund the rental, lease, or purchase of the simulated 1128
driving curriculum of the Michelle's leading star foundation by 1129
boards of education of city, exempted village, local, and joint 1130
vocational school districts. 1131
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1132
receives pursuant to section 4503.941 of the Revised Code to the 1133
Ohio chapter international society of arboriculture, which shall 1134
use the money to increase consumer awareness on the importance 1135
of proper tree care and to raise funds for the chapter's 1136
educational efforts. 1137
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 1138
pursuant to section 4503.942 of the Revised Code to zero, the 1139
end of prostate cancer, incorporated, a nonprofit organization, 1140
which shall use those contributions to raise awareness of 1141
prostate cancer, to support research to end prostate cancer, and 1142

H. B. No. 419 Page 40
As Introduced
to support prostate cancer patients and their families. 1143
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1144
receives pursuant to section 4503.943 of the Revised Code to the 1145
nonprofit organization weirdo cat lovers of Cleveland, which 1146
shall use the contributions to further its mission of assisting 1147
pet parents with emergency veterinary bills for their feline 1148
companions, providing food and litter to those in economic need, 1149
and controlling feral cat populations through the process of 1150
trap-neuter-return to the community. 1151
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1152
receives pursuant to section 4503.944 of the Revised Code to the 1153
eastern European congress of Ohio, which shall use the 1154
contributions for charitable and educational purposes. 1155
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1156
receives pursuant to section 4503.945 of the Revised Code to the 1157
Summit metro parks foundation, which shall use the money in 1158
support of the Summit county metro parks. 1159
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1160
receives pursuant to section 4503.946 of the Revised Code to the 1161
Ohio society, sons of the American revolution, which shall use 1162
the contributions for special projects related to historical 1163
education. 1164
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1165
receives pursuant to section 4503.951 of the Revised Code to the 1166
Cincinnati city school district. 1167
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1168
receives pursuant to section 4503.952 of the Revised Code to 1169
Hawken school located in northeast Ohio. The school shall use 1170
fifty per cent of the contributions it receives to provide 1171

H. B. No. 419 Page 41
As Introduced
tuition assistance to its students. The school shall use the 1172
remaining fifty per cent to pay the expenses it incurs in 1173
providing services to the school's students that assist in 1174
developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of 1175
the students. The services provided may include bereavement 1176
counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, 1177
sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of 1178
students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, 1179
suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of 1180
providing such services, the school may pay for members of the 1181
faculty of the school to receive training in providing those 1182
services. The school principal or, in the school principal's 1183
discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any 1184
charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those 1185
services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable 1186
organization is exempt from federal income taxation under 1187
subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school 1188
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 1189
purpose. 1190
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1191
receives pursuant to section 4503.953 of the Revised Code to 1192
Gilmour academy located in the municipal corporation of Gates 1193
Mills. The school shall use fifty per cent of the contributions 1194
it receives to provide tuition assistance to its students. The 1195
school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to pay the 1196
expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's 1197
students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and 1198
emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may 1199
include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving 1200
techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and 1201
education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug 1202

H. B. No. 419 Page 42
As Introduced
abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of 1203
providing such services, the school may pay for members of the 1204
faculty of the school to receive training in providing those 1205
services. The school principal or, in the school principal's 1206
discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any 1207
charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those 1208
services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable 1209
organization is exempt from federal income taxation under 1210
subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school 1211
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 1212
purpose. 1213
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1214
receives pursuant to section 4503.954 of the Revised Code to 1215
University school located in the suburban area near the 1216
municipal corporation of Cleveland. The school shall use fifty 1217
per cent of the contributions it receives to provide tuition 1218
assistance to its students. The school shall use the remaining 1219
fifty per cent to pay the expenses it incurs in providing 1220
services to the school's students that assist in developing or 1221
maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of the students. 1222
The services provided may include bereavement counseling, 1223
instruction in defensive driving techniques, sensitivity 1224
training, and the counseling and education of students regarding 1225
bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and 1226
human trafficking. As a part of providing such services, the 1227
school may pay for members of the faculty of the school to 1228
receive training in providing those services. The school 1229
principal or, in the school principal's discretion, appropriate 1230
school counselors shall determine any charitable organizations 1231
that the school hires to provide those services. The school 1232
shall ensure that any such charitable organization is exempt 1233

H. B. No. 419 Page 43
As Introduced
from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the 1234
Internal Revenue Code. The school shall not use the 1235
contributions it receives for any other purpose. 1236
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1237
receives pursuant to section 4503.955 of the Revised Code to 1238
Saint Albert the Great school located in North Royalton. The 1239
school shall use fifty per cent of the contributions it receives 1240
to provide tuition assistance to its students. The school shall 1241
use the remaining fifty per cent to pay the expenses it incurs 1242
in providing services to the school's students that assist in 1243
developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of 1244
the students. The services provided may include bereavement 1245
counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, 1246
sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of 1247
students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, 1248
suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of 1249
providing such services, the school may pay for members of the 1250
faculty of the school to receive training in providing those 1251
services. The school principal or, in the school principal's 1252
discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any 1253
charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those 1254
services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable 1255
organization is exempt from federal income taxation under 1256
subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school 1257
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 1258
purpose. 1259
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1260
receives pursuant to section 4503.956 of the Revised Code to the 1261
Liberty Center local school district, which shall use the 1262
contributions for its gifted programs and special education and 1263
related services. 1264

H. B. No. 419 Page 44
As Introduced
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1265
receives pursuant to section 4503.957 of the Revised Code to 1266
John F. Kennedy Catholic school located in Warren. The school 1267
shall not use the contributions it receives for any political 1268
purpose. 1269
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1270
receives pursuant to section 4503.958 of the Revised Code to 1271
Elder high school located in the municipal corporation of 1272
Cincinnati. The school shall use fifty per cent of the 1273
contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its 1274
students, twenty-five per cent of the contributions to benefit 1275
arts and enrichment at the school, and twenty-five per cent of 1276
the contributions to benefit athletics at the school. 1277
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1278
receives pursuant to section 4503.959 of the Revised Code to the 1279
Dublin food pantry, which shall use the contributions to provide 1280
food, hygiene products, and other resources to individuals and 1281
families experiencing food insecurity. 1282
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1283
receives pursuant to section 4503.961 of the Revised Code to 1284
Fairfield senior high school located in the municipal 1285
corporation of Fairfield. The high school shall not use the 1286
contributions for any political purpose. 1287
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1288
receives pursuant to section 4503.962 of the Revised Code to 1289
Hamilton high school located in the municipal corporation of 1290
Hamilton. The high school shall not use the contributions for 1291
any political purpose. 1292
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1293

H. B. No. 419 Page 45
As Introduced
receives pursuant to section 4503.963 of the Revised Code to 1294
Ross high school located in Ross township in Butler county. The 1295
high school shall not use the contributions for any political 1296
purpose. 1297
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1298
receives pursuant to section 4503.964 of the Revised Code to 1299
Chardon hilltopper gridiron club. The club shall use 1300
contributions to fund college and career technical training 1301
scholarships for students. 1302
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1303
receives pursuant to section 4503.965 of the Revised Code to the 1304
Norton music boosters association. The association shall use the 1305
contributions to provide financial assistance to the Norton high 1306
school music boosters for equipment, travel, and programming 1307
expenses. 1308
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1309
receives pursuant to section 4503.97 of the Revised Code to the 1310
friends of united Hatzalah of Israel, which shall use the money 1311
to support united Hatzalah of Israel, which provides free 1312
emergency medical first response throughout Israel. 1313
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1314
receives pursuant to section 4503.98 of the Revised Code to the 1315
Westerville parks foundation to support the programs and 1316
activities of the foundation and its mission of pursuing the 1317
city of Westerville's vision of becoming "A City Within A Park." 1318
(C) All investment earnings of the license plate 1319
contribution fund shall be credited to the fund. Not later than 1320
the first day of May of every year, the registrar shall 1321
distribute to each entity described in division (B) of this 1322

H. B. No. 419 Page 46
As Introduced
section the investment income the fund earned the previous 1323
calendar year. The amount of such a distribution paid to an 1324
entity shall be proportionate to the amount of money the entity 1325
received from the fund during the previous calendar year. 1326
Sec. 4503.727. (A) The owner or lessee of any passenger 1327
car, noncommercial motor vehicle, recreational vehicle, or other 1328
vehicle of a class approved by the registrar of motor vehicles 1329
may apply to the registrar for the registration of the vehicle 1330
and issuance of "Save22" license plates. The application may be 1331
combined with a request for a special reserved license plate 1332
under section 4503.40 or 4503.42 of the Revised Code. Upon 1333
receipt of the completed application and compliance by the 1334
applicant with divisions (B) and (C) of this section, the 1335
registrar shall issue to the applicant the appropriate vehicle 1336
registration and a set of "Save22" license plates and a 1337
validation sticker, or a validation sticker alone, when required 1338
by section 4503.191 of the Revised Code. 1339
In addition to the letters and numbers ordinarily 1340
inscribed on the license plates, "Save22" license plates shall 1341
display an appropriate logo and words that are selected by 1342
representatives of Save22 and approved by the registrar. 1343
"Save22" license plates shall display county identification 1344
stickers that identify the county of registration as required 1345
under section 4503.19 of the Revised Code. 1346
(B) "Save22" license plates and a validation sticker, or 1347
validation sticker alone, shall be issued upon receipt of an 1348
application for registration of a motor vehicle under this 1349
section; payment of the regular license tax as prescribed under 1350
section 4503.04 of the Revised Code, any applicable motor 1351
vehicle license tax levied under Chapter 4504. of the Revised 1352

H. B. No. 419 Page 47
As Introduced
Code, any applicable additional fee prescribed by section 1353
4503.40 or 4503.42 of the Revised Code, an additional 1354
administrative fee of ten dollars, and a contribution as 1355
provided in division (C)(1) of this section; and compliance with 1356
all other applicable laws relating to the registration of motor 1357
vehicles. 1358
(C)(1) For each application for registration and 1359
registration renewal notice the registrar receives under this 1360
section, the registrar shall collect a contribution of twenty- 1361
two dollars. The registrar shall deposit this contribution into 1362
the state treasury to the credit of the license plate 1363
contribution fund created in section 4501.21 of the Revised 1364
Code. 1365
(2) The registrar shall deposit the administrative fee of 1366
ten dollars, the purpose of which is to compensate the bureau of 1367
motor vehicles for additional services required in the issuing 1368
of "Save22" license plates, into the state treasury to the 1369
credit of the public safety - highway purposes fund created in 1370
section 4501.06 of the Revised Code. 1371
Section 2. That existing section 4501.21 of the Revised 1372
Code is hereby repealed. 1373
Section 3. Section 4501.21 of the Revised Code is 1374
presented in this act as a composite of the section as amended 1375
by both H.B. 315 and S.B. 163 of the 135th General Assembly. The 1376
General Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) 1377
of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be 1378
harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, 1379
finds that the composite is the resulting version of the section 1380
in effect prior to the effective date of the section as 1381
presented in this act. 1382